Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.4851

Minimum retirement allowance—Annual adjustment—Persons who become beneficiaries after June 30, 1995.

(1) No one who becomes a beneficiary after June 30, 1995, shall receive a monthly retirement allowance of less than twenty-four dollars and twenty-two cents times the number of years of service creditable to the person whose service is the basis of such retirement allowance.

(2) If the retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.

(3) Beginning July 1, 1996, the minimum benefit set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted annually by the annual increase.

(4) Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW 41.32.540 shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by this section.

(5) Beginning July 1, 2011, the minimum benefit set forth in subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with either (a) at least twenty years of service and who has been retired at least twenty-five years, or (b) at least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least twenty years, shall be one thousand five hundred dollars per month. On July 1, 2011, and each year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this subsection shall be increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.

[ 2011 c 362 s 4; 2006 c 244 s 1; 2004 c 85 s 1; 1995 c 345 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2011 c 362: See notes following RCW 41.32.483.

Effective date—2006 c 244: "This act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 244 s 3.]

Intent—Effective date—1995 c 345: See notes following RCW 41.32.489.